Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 22 Costs

9-22-1.
Court order requiring nonresident plaintiff to give surety for costs.

The court before which any civil action, whether by appeal or otherwise, is pending may, at any time before final judgment or decree therein, upon motion of any defendant and for cause shown, require a plaintiff who is not an inhabitant of this state to give some sufficient person residing within this state or some surety company authorized to do business therein as surety for costs, which may be done by the surety endorsing his or her name on the complaint with the words “surety for costs,” or by giving bond therefor; and when surety has once been given, may for cause shown, require the plaintiff to give another surety for costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 442; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 37.

9-22-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 443; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 39, effective January 10, 1966.

9-22-3.
Dismissal for failure to give surety.

Upon the neglect of the plaintiff to comply with an order of the court requiring a surety or another surety, as provided in §

9-22-1

, his or her action or suit may be dismissed with costs for the defendant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 444; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 22.

9-22-4.
Liability of surety.

Every surety shall be liable, in case the plaintiff shall not make good his or her case, to pay all costs that shall be awarded against the plaintiff; provided, that proceedings are brought therefor within one year after final decree or judgment in the suit or action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 445; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-4

.

9-22-5.
Recovery of costs by prevailing party.

In civil actions at law, the party prevailing shall recover costs, except where otherwise specially provided, or as justice may require, in the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 441; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-5

.

9-22-6.
Apportionment of costs in action for partition.

In all actions of partition, the court before which the action may be pending may adjudge and determine, as to it shall appear equitable and just, relative to the apportionment of costs among the parties, plaintiff and defendant, by dividing the costs equally or subjecting either party to the payment of the whole or any part thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 446; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-6

.

9-22-7.
Apportionment of surveyors’ and other fees.

Any court may divide or apportion, between the parties in a suit pending, the fees of surveyors and other persons performing services therein by direction of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 447; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-7

.

9-22-8.
Costs in excess of claim — Attachment on small claims.

In civil actions, no plaintiff shall recover costs in excess of the amount of his or her claim; nor shall any plaintiff in any action commenced by original writ or by writ of mesne process where property other than real estate is attached recover the costs of the attachment when the final judgment is for an amount less than fifty dollars ($50.00), unless the obligation sued upon is for necessaries furnished the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 345, § 21, as enacted by P.L. 1936, ch. 2392, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 8; P.L. 1940, ch. 933, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-8

.

9-22-9.
Costs on motions, petitions, and appeals.

Any court may award costs on motions, petitions, or appeals filed in actions, suits, and other proceedings pending before it, for or against either party, in its discretion, and upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe by general rule or special order.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 449; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-9

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 8.

9-22-10.
Matters before superior court in vacation.

In all cases where power is conferred upon the superior court to hear and determine any matter in vacation, the court may, in its discretion, award costs to either or neither party thereto, or divide the costs in any proportion between the parties; such costs to be taxed by the clerk unless objected to by either party, in which event the costs shall be passed on by the court, and, if allowed, collected by execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 450; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-10

.

9-22-11.
Costs to defendant on withdrawal or discontinuance.

If the plaintiff in any case shall file his or her complaint as is provided by law and shall afterward withdraw or discontinue his or her suit after pleadings filed by the defendant, the defendant in the case shall recover his or her costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 451; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-11

.

9-22-12.
Discharge or discontinuance as to codefendant.

Whenever several persons shall be made defendants in any action and the action shall be discontinued as to any one or more of the defendants, or if, upon the trial thereof, any one or more of them shall be acquitted by verdict or upon motion, every defendant so discharged or acquitted shall have and recover his or her costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 452; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-12

.

9-22-13.
Travel and attendance costs of joint party.

In all civil actions brought by or against a firm, company, or partnership and where there is a joint cause of action or joint defense, costs for travel and attendance of only one of the parties recovering judgment shall be taxed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 453; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-13

.

9-22-14.
Actions by assignee or indorsee of promissory note.

In all actions on promissory notes in the name of the assignee or indorsee of the note against the original promisor, no more costs shall be taxed than would by law be taxable if the action had been brought in the name of the payee of the note.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 454; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-14

.

9-22-15.
Witness fees allowed where certificate filed after judgment.

Unless the certificate of a witness for his or her attendance and travel is filed with the clerk of the court rendering judgment not later than ten (10) days after the rendition of judgment in the cause in which he or she shall have attended or been summoned, no more fees shall be taxed in favor of the party procuring the witness than one day’s attendance and travel; provided, that in a district court no fees shall be taxed in favor of the party procuring the witness in any cause in which an appeal shall be claimed after judgment, unless there shall be filed with the clerk of the court within one day after entry of judgment, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, the certificate of the witness for his or her attendance and travel, or the summons for the witness; in which latter case fees shall be taxed for only one day’s attendance and travel.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 455; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 15; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-15

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 37.

9-22-16.
Extra costs for appeal to delay.

If it shall appear, on an appeal, exception, or other proceeding, from a lower to a higher court, that the proceeding has been taken (or affidavit filed) solely for delay, the court shall impose double costs on the party so seeking delay, or, in its discretion, treble costs if the case shall seem to warrant it.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 456; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-16

.

9-22-17.
Taxation by clerk — Approval or revision by justice.

Subject to regulation by rule of court, all bills of costs shall be taxed by the clerks of the respective court, and, when objected to, shall be revised or approved by one of the justices of the court in which the judgment or order is entered, or by the justice of the district court, when the case is in a district court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 457; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-17

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 37.

9-22-18.
Disallowance of unjustified costs — Costs for written evidence.

The justice of any court, who shall examine and approve any bill of costs, shall strike out and disallow any sum that may be taxed or demanded for the expense of any witness, or any evidence whatsoever, that shall appear to the justice to be overcharged, frivolous, or not material to the issue of the cause; and no costs shall be allowed for any written evidence, unless the fees are noted thereon, or certified by the officer who issued or made out the written evidence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 458; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-18

.

9-22-19.
Expense of printing record.

The expense of printing the record in any case where the parties agree to have the record printed, or where the court orders the printing, shall be taxed as other costs in the case.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 459; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-19

.

9-22-20.
Costs on appeal.

In all appeals, the court appealed to, on rendering judgment therein, may award costs for or against the appellant or appellee, or for neither of them, or may apportion the costs among the parties appellant and appellee, according to the circumstances of the case, and as shall appear equitable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 460; G.L. 1909, ch. 295, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 345, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 536, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

9-22-20

.

9-22-21.
Costs on depositions.

The taxation of costs in the taking of depositions shall be subject to the discretion of the court. No costs shall be allowed unless the court finds that the taking of the deposition was reasonably necessary, whether or not the deposition was actually used at the trial. Taxable costs may include the cost of service of subpoena upon the deponent, the reasonable charge of the officer before whom the deposition was taken, the fees and mileage allowances of witnesses, the stenographer’s reasonable fee for attendance, and the cost of the transcript of the testimony or such part thereof as the court may fix.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 38.